Utah statutes.
13-22-5.   Registration required.
(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any organization to engage in an activity
described in Subsection (1)(b) unless the organization is:
(i)  exempt under Section 13-22-8; or
(ii)  registered with the division in accordance with this chapter.
(b)  Unless an organization meets the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the
organization may not knowingly solicit, request, promote, advertise, or
sponsor a charitable solicitation if the charitable solicitation:
(i)  originates in Utah;
(ii)  is received in Utah; or
(iii)  is caused to be made through business operations in Utah.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not prohibit an organization from receiving an
unsolicited contribution.
(3)  It is unlawful for any professional fund raiser to knowingly solicit,
request, promote, advertise, or sponsor the solicitation in this state of any
contribution for a charitable organization, whether or not the charitable
organization is exempt under Section 13-22-8, unless the professional fund
raiser and any nonexempt charitable organization that is benefitted are
registered with the division.
(4)  It is unlawful for any professional fund raising counsel or consultant to
knowingly plan, manage, advise, counsel, consult, or prepare material for, or
with respect to, the solicitation in this state of a contribution for a
charitable organization, whether or not the charitable organization is exempt
under Section 13-22-8, unless the professional fund raising counsel or
consultant and any nonexempt charitable organization that is benefitted are
registered with the division.
